Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.14.340

Notice and hearing—Filings and recordings.

The legislative body of the code city shall hold two or more public hearings, to be held at least thirty days apart, upon the proposed zoning regulation, giving notice of the time and place thereof by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the annexing city and the area to be annexed. A copy of the ordinance or resolution adopting or embodying such proposed zoning regulation or any part thereof or any amendment thereto, duly certified as a true copy by the clerk of the annexing city, shall be filed with the county auditor. A like certified copy of any map or plat referred to or adopted by the ordinance or resolution shall likewise be filed with the county auditor. The auditor shall record the ordinance or resolution and keep on file the map or plat.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.14.340.]

NOTES:

Annexation of water, sewer, and fire districts: Chapter 35.13A RCW.